Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Chapter 5

Clerks of Chancery Court

18-5-101. Appointment — Tenure.

The clerk and masters of the chancery courts are appointed by the respective chancellors and hold their offices for six (6) years.

Code 1858, § 323 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 13); Shan., § 399; Code 1932, § 649; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-501.

Cross-References. Appointment of clerk and master and term of office, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 13; §§18-2-213,18-4-101.

Compensation, §8-24-102.

Consolidated retirement system, title 8, chs. 34-37, 39.

Deputies and assistants, title 8, chapter 20.

Fees for services, title 8, ch. 21, part 4, §§8-21-601,8-21-602.

Report and payment of revenues, §§9-2-108 —9-2-122.

Retirement system for county officials (superseded), Vol. 3 Appendix.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Comparative Legislation. Chancery court clerks:

Ark. Code §16-20-301 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §9-5-131 et seq.

18-5-102. Duties.

The clerk and master of the chancery court, in addition to the duties prescribed by chapters 1 and 2 of this title, is required to:

Keep a rule docket, in which shall be entered the names of the complainants and defendants in full, the names of the attorneys and counsel, a minute of the date of the issuance and return of process, with the return on the process, and a note of all the orders and proceedings made at office;

Keep a well-bound book, in which shall be entered, under the name of each case, the depositions taken and filed in the case, the names of the witnesses, and the date of the filing, and by whom. This book may be dispensed with by keeping the rule docket in such a way as to enable the entries required in this section to be made in the docket, without interfering with the entries regularly belonging to that docket;

Issue all original, mesne and final process from the court, make orders of publication for defendants, grant decrees pro confesso for want of answer, hear exceptions to bills, answers and reports, subject at all times to the control, direction and supervision of the chancellor; and

Perform such other duties as are, or may be, by law required.

Code 1858, § 4085 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, §§ 44, 46; 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 3); Shan., § 5899; Code 1932, § 10099; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-502.

Cross-References. Accounting for fees, title 8, chapter 22.

Annual audit, §4-3-304.

Fees, title 8, ch. 21, part 4.

Fees for accounting made in decedents' estates, §30-2-611.

Notice of accounting in decedents' estates given by, §30-2-603.

Payment for office supplies, §8-26-104.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 631, 632, 642.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Attorney General Opinions. Compensation for clerk and master serving as substitute judge not authorized, OAG 99-087 (4/8/99).

Cited: Kelton v. Snell, 689 S.W.2d 186, 1985 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2668 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1985).

18-5-103. Powers as master in chancery.

The clerk and master of the chancery court is authorized to administer oaths and perform all the functions of masters in chancery, unless restrained by the provisions of law.

Code 1858, § 4086; Shan., § 5900; Code 1932, § 10100; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-503.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

18-5-104. Adjournment of court.

The master in chancery may adjourn court, in the absence of the chancellor, from day to day, for three (3) days in succession, or longer if, in the master in chancery's judgment, the interest of the public requires it, and then adjourn it to the court in course or to the time fixed by the chancellor for holding a special term.

Code 1858, § 4087 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 50, § 1); Shan., § 5901; Code 1932, § 10101; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-504.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 639.

18-5-105. Investment of funds of minors and incompetents.

Clerks and masters of the chancery courts, having in their hands funds belonging to minors or incompetents who have no regular guardian or other custodian or other person authorized by law to demand the funds, may invest the funds as provided in §8-21-401(i)(8) or, if applicable, §8-21-409(f)(1) without prior specific order of the court if, in their best judgment, it appears that the funds will be idle and payment of funds will not be demanded for a period of thirty (30) days from and after receipt of funds.

Acts 1961, ch. 239, § 1; T.C.A., § 18-506; Acts 2010, ch. 969, § 1.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “§8-21-401(i)(8) or, if applicable, §8-21-409(f)(1)” for “former §18-5-106 [repealed]”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 969, § 2. May 26, 2010.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

18-5-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §18-5-106 (Acts 1961, ch. 239, § 2; T.C.A., § 18-507; Acts 1983, ch. 416, § 1), concerning authorized investments, fees and interest, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 2006.

18-5-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §18-5-107 (Acts 1978, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 18-508), concerning interest payments on funds invested by court clerks, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 416, § 1.